Washington statutes.
RCW 19.100.900

Chapter applicable to existing and future franchises and contracts.

The provisions of this chapter shall be applicable to all franchises and contracts existing between franchisors and franchisees and to all future franchises and contracts.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 252 s 28.]